test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ruuqtsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - rūʼtš: # Noun 145 'eng /est toriseja/fin' - full paradigm
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Nom: [rūʼtš, rūtš]
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Gen: [rūʼtš, rūtš]
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Par: [rūʼtšõ, rūtšõ]
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Dat: [rūʼtšõn, rūtšõn]
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Ins: [rūʼtšõks, rūtšõks]
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Ill: [rūʼtšõ, rūtšõ]
     rūʼtš+N+Sg+Ela: [rūʼtšõst, rūtšõst]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Nom: [rūʼtšõd, rūtšõd]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Gen: [rūʼtšõd, rūtšõd]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Par: [rūʼtšidi, rūtšidi]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Dat: [rūʼtšõdõn, rūtšõdõn]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Ins: [rūʼtšõdõks, rūtšõdõks]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Ill: [rūʼtšiz, rūtšiz]
     rūʼtš+N+Pl+Ela: [rūʼtšist, rūtšist]
